fst/lexc/git_verbs.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+VI
+VT
-ATTR
-TR

LEXICON IntransitiveVerb
+VI:	VIDeriv ;

LEXICON VIDeriv
	VIInfl ;

LEXICON VIInfl
-ATTR:^m	# ;
	Word ;
	SeriesII ;
	daPlClitic ;
	SX ;

LEXICON TransitiveVerb
+VT:		VTDeriv ;

LEXICON VTDeriv
	VTInfl ;
	# ;		! for e.g. complement clause verbs
@D.VAL.BIGT@-T:@D.VAL.BIGT@^T 			VTInfl ;

LEXICON VTInfl
		SeriesII ;
-TR:^i	SeriesII ;
		
